District of Columbia statutes.
15-369

Statute of limitations.

An action to recognize a foreign-country judgment must be commenced within the earlier of the time during which the foreign-country judgment is effective in the foreign country or 15 years from the date that the foreign-country judgment became effective in the foreign country.

History

Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11186

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 9 of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.